Washington statutes.
RCW 44.16.150

Punishment for contempt.

Any person being in contempt, as hereinbefore provided, shall be punished by fine in any sum not less than fifty dollars and not exceeding one thousand dollars, or by imprisonment in the county jail in the county where such examination is being had, for any period of time not extending beyond the legislative session then being held, or by both such fine and imprisonment, as the legislative body which authorized such examination may order. And in case the contempt arises in a joint proceeding of both houses, or before a joint committee thereof, the senate shall prescribe the penalty.

[ 1895 c 6 s 13; RRS s 8190.]

NOTES:

Contempt: Chapter 7.21 RCW.

Witness refusing to attend legislature or committee or to testify: RCW 9.55.020.